North Dakota statutes. TITLE 3 Agency
CHAPTER 3-01 Creation and Termination of Agency

3-01-01.
Definition.

Agency is the relationship which results when one person, called the principal, authorizes another, called the agent, to act for the principal in dealing with third persons.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1337; R.C. 1895, § 4303; R.C. 1899, § 4303; R.C. 1905, § 5751; C.L. 1913, § 6319; R.C. 1943, § 3-0101.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2295.

Formation of Agency Relationship.

In the formation of the agency relationship it is necessary that the principal shall, either expressly or by implication from conduct for which he is responsible, appoint the agent, and it is equally essential that the agent accept the appointment. Lander v. Hartson, 77 N.D. 923, 47 N.W.2d 211, 1951 N.D. LEXIS 121 (N.D. 1951).

Credit company was permitted to file an agricultural supplier’s lien for supplies, even though it was not the seller of such, because it was an agent for the seller, pursuant to an agency agreement. The credit company was the actual agent of the seller for the purpose of collecting account receivables, which gave it the authority to file such a lien.

Stockman Bank v. AGSCO, Inc., 2007 ND 26, 728 N.W.2d 142, 2007 N.D. LEXIS 31 (N.D. 2007).

N.D.C.C. § 38-18.1-04 allows an owner’s representative to record a statement of claim and does not require the owner of the mineral interest to record the claim. Therefore, a mineral interest did not lapse in quiet title action; the statute of frauds did not apply since there was not a transfer of real property, and an agreement by several heirs to have two people act as their representatives was not required to be in writing.

Larson v. Norheim, 2013 ND 60, 830 N.W.2d 85, 2013 N.D. LEXIS 60 (N.D. 2013).

3-01-02.
General and special agent defined.

An agent for a particular act or transaction is called a special agent. All others are general agents.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1339; R.C. 1895, § 4305; R.C. 1899, § 4305; R.C. 1905, § 5753; C.L. 1913, § 6321; R.C. 1943, § 3-0102.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2297.

3-01-03.
Actual and ostensible agency defined.

An agency is either actual or ostensible. It is actual when the agent really is employed by the principal. It is ostensible when the principal intentionally or by want of ordinary care causes a third person to believe another to be the principal’s agent, who really is not employed by the principal.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, §§ 1340 to 1342; R.C. 1895, §§ 4306 to 4308; R.C. 1899, §§ 4306 to 4308; R.C. 1905, §§ 5754 to 5756; C.L. 1913, §§ 6322 to 6324; R.C. 1943, § 3-0103.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2298 to 2300.

Cross-References.

Actual or ostensible authority, see § 3-02-02.

3-01-04.
Who may appoint an agent — Who may be agent.

Any person having capacity to contract may appoint an agent and any person may be an agent.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1338; R.C. 1895, § 4304; R.C. 1899, § 4304; R.C. 1905, § 5752; C.L. 1913, § 6320; R.C. 1943, § 3-0104.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2296.

3-01-05.
Authorization to agent.

An agent may be authorized to do any acts which the agent’s principal might do, except those to which the principal is bound to give personal attention.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1343; R.C. 1895, § 4309; R.C. 1899, § 4309; R.C. 1905, § 5757; C.L. 1913, § 6325; R.C. 1943, § 3-0105.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2304.

Cross-References.

Damages for breach of warranty of agent’s authority, see § 32-03-18.

3-01-06.
How agency created.

An agency may be created and an authority may be conferred by a prior authorization or a subsequent ratification.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1346; R.C. 1895, § 4312; R.C. 1899, § 4312; R.C. 1905, § 5760; C.L. 1913, § 6328; R.C. 1943, § 3-0106.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2307.

3-01-07.
No consideration necessary.

The relationship of principal and agent can be created although neither party receives consideration.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1347; R.C. 1895, § 4313; R.C. 1899, § 4313; R.C. 1905, § 5761; C.L. 1913, § 6329; R.C. 1943, § 3-0107.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2308.

3-01-08.
Ratification of agency — How made — Extent.

A ratification can be made only in the manner that would have been necessary to confer an original authority for the act ratified or, when an oral authorization would suffice, by accepting or retaining the benefit of the act with notice thereof. A ratification is not valid unless at the time of ratifying the act done the principal has power to confer authority for such an act and ratification of part of an indivisible transaction is a ratification of the whole.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, §§ 1349 to 1351; R.C. 1895, §§ 4315 to 4317; R.C. 1899, §§ 4315 to 4317; R.C. 1905, §§ 5763 to 5765; C.L. 1913, §§ 6331 to 6333; R.C. 1943, § 3-0108.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2310 to 2312.

3-01-09.
Retroactive ratification limited.

No unauthorized act can be made valid retroactively to the prejudice of third persons without their consent.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1352; R.C. 1895, § 4318; R.C. 1899, § 4318; R.C. 1905, § 5766; C.L. 1913, § 6334; R.C. 1943, § 3-0109.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2313.

3-01-10.
Rescission of ratification.

A ratification may be rescinded when made without such consent as is required in a contract or with an imperfect knowledge of the material facts of the transaction ratified, but not otherwise.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1353; R.C. 1895, § 4319; R.C. 1899, § 4319; R.C. 1905, § 5767; C.L. 1913, § 6335; R.C. 1943, § 3-0110.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2314.

3-01-11.
Termination of agency.

An agency is terminated as to every person having notice thereof by:

Expiration of its term;

Extinction of its subject;

Death of the agent;

Renunciation by the agent; or

Incapacity of the agent to act as such.

Unless the power of an agent is coupled with an interest in the subject of the agency, it is terminated as to every person having notice thereof by:

Its revocation by the principal;

Death of the principal; or

Incapacity of the principal to contract.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, §§ 1383, 1384; R.C. 1895, §§ 4349, 4350; R.C. 1899, §§ 4349, 4350; R.C. 1905, §§ 5797, 5798; C.L. 1913, §§ 6365, 6366; R.C. 1943, § 3-0111.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2355, 2356.